Wisconsin, session 2025, SB922.
do enact as follows:SB922,11Section 1. 5.05 (1) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:SB922,3,325.05 (1) (e) Issue an order under s. 5.06, exempt a polling place from 3accessibility requirements under s. 5.25 (4) (a), permit a municipality to provide 4notices required at polling places by alternative means under s. 5.35 (6) (d), exempt 5a municipality from the requirement to use voting machines or an electronic voting 6system under s. 5.40 (5m), approve an electronic data recording system for 7maintaining poll lists under s. 6.79, or authorize nonappointment of an individual 1who is nominated to serve as an election official under s. 7.30 (4) (e), or review and 2investigate complaints received under s. 12.17 (4) and order corrective measures 3under s. 12.17 (5) (a).SB922,24Section 2. 5.056 of the statutes is amended to read:SB922,3,1355.056 Matching program with secretary of transportation. The 6commission administrator shall enter into the agreement with the secretary of 7transportation specified under s. 85.61 (1) to match personally identifiable 8information on the official registration list maintained by the commission under s. 96.36 (1) and the information specified in s. ss. 6.256 (2) and 6.34 (2m) with 10personally identifiable information maintained by the department of 11transportation. Subject to s. 343.14 (2p) (b), the agreement shall provide for the 12electronic transfer of information under s. 6.256 (2) to the commission on a 13continuous basis, no less often than monthly.SB922,314Section 3. 5.06 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB922,3,23155.06 (2) No Except as authorized in ss. 5.07 (2) and 12.17 (3), no person who is 16authorized to file a complaint under sub. (1), other than the attorney general or a 17district attorney, may commence an action or proceeding to test the validity of any 18decision, action or failure to act on the part of any election official with respect to 19any matter specified in sub. (1) without first filing a complaint under sub. (1), nor 20prior to disposition of the complaint by the commission. A complaint is deemed 21disposed of if the commission fails to transmit an acknowledgment of receipt of the 22complaint within 5 business days from the date of its receipt or if the commission 23concludes its investigation without a formal decision.SB922,41Section 4. 5.07 of the statutes is renumbered 5.07 (1).SB922,52Section 5. 5.07 (2) of the statutes is created to read:SB922,4,935.07 (2) Whenever a violation of s. 5.25 (4) (b), 5.35 (6) (a) 4c., 7.08 (3), 12.09, 4or 12.19 occurs or is proposed to occur, any elector of this state may sue for 5injunctive relief, a writ of mandamus or prohibition, or such other legal or equitable 6relief as may be appropriate to compel compliance with the law. The action shall be 7filed in circuit court for the county where the violation occurs or is proposed to 8occur. In such actions, the court shall award costs and reasonable actual attorney 9fees to the plaintiff if the plaintiff prevails in the action. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb922 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb922 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB922 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB922 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB922: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting